Florida, session 2026, HB621.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (2) and paragraph (a) of subsection
(3) of section 252.36, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
252.36 Emergency management powers of the Governor.—
(2) A state of emergency must be declared by executive
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb621-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 621 2026
order or proclamation of the Governor if she or he finds an
emergency has occurred or that the occurrence or the threat
thereof is imminent. The state of emergency must continue until
the Governor finds that the threat or danger has been dealt with
to the extent that the emergency conditions no longer exist and
she or he terminates the state of emergency by executive order
or proclamation, but no state of emergency may continue for
longer than 60 days unless renewed by the Governor, subject to
the limitations of subsection (3). All executive orders or
proclamations issued under this section must indicate the nature
of the emergency, the area or areas threatened, and the
conditions which brought the emergency about or which make
possible its termination. An executive order or proclamation
must be promptly disseminated by means calculated to bring its
contents to the attention of the general public; and, unless the
circumstances attendant upon the emergency prevent or impede
such filing, the order or proclamation must be filed promptly
with the Department of State, the President of the Senate and
the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the offices of
the county commissioners in the counties to which the order or
proclamation applies.
(3)(a)1. A state of emergency renewed by the Governor
expires after 1 year, and any specific order, proclamation, or
rule thereunder is terminated, unless the Legislature, by a two-
thirds vote of the membership of each house, expressly
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb621-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 621 2026
authorizes the extension of the state of emergency.
2. If the Legislature authorizes a continuance of the
state of emergency, the Legislature must set the date the state
of emergency terminates. Such date may not be later than the
scheduled end of the next regular session.
3. At any time, the Legislature, by concurrent resolution,
may terminate a state of emergency or any specific order,
proclamation, or rule thereunder. Upon such concurrent
resolution, the Governor shall immediately issue an executive
order or proclamation consistent with the concurrent resolution.
4. If the Legislature terminates or allows a state of
emergency to expire, the Governor may not declare a
substantially similar state of emergency.
Section 2. Subsection (3) of section 252.3611, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
252.3611 Transparency; audits.—
(3) Once an emergency exceeds 1 year, the Auditor General
shall conduct a financial audit of all associated expenditures
and a compliance audit of all associated contracts entered into
during the declared emergency. The Auditor General shall must
update the audit quarterly annually until the emergency is
declared to be ended.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb621-00